California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) This section shall not be construed to be, or act as, a waiver of any applicable attorney-client or
 attorney work product privileges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 145, Sec. 2.   (SB 339)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Revenue [7880. - 7887.]

7880.

A certificate of registration as a geologist or as a specialty geologist or as a geophysicist or as a specialty geophysicist shall expire at 12 a.m. of the last day of the birth month of the certificate holder during the second year of a two-year term if not renewed. To renew an unexpired certificate, the certificate holder shall, on or before the date of expiration of the certificate, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter.

For purposes of implementing the distribution of the renewal of registrations throughout the year, the board may establish a system of staggered certificate expiration dates and a pro rata formula for the payment of renewal fees by certificate holders affected by the implementation of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1289, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7881.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, certificates of registration as a geologist or as a geophysicist, or certified specialty certificates, may be renewed at any time within five years after expiration on filing an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. If the certificate is renewed more than 30 days after its expiration, the certificate holder, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which all renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the certificate shall continue in effect through the date provided in Section 7880 that next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 306, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7881.5.

(a) At the time of renewal specified in Section 7880 or 7881, the board shall administer an assessment of the certificate holder to reinforce the certificate holder’s knowledge of state laws and the board’s rules and regulations. Failure to complete this assessment within 60 days after the date of expiration of the certificate may result in disciplinary action under Section
 7860, but shall not affect the renewal of the certificate.

(b) The crime in subdivision (h) of Section 7872 shall not apply to this section.

(c) The board shall not charge the certificate holder a fee for the administration or development of the assessment.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “assessment” means an online program that contains educational reading material and questions. The material shall be based on state law and the board’s rules and regulations relating to the practice of professional geologists and geophysicists. The scope of the assessment shall be
 limited to the board’s top five types of violations related to the administrative and procedural aspects of the practice of professional geologists and geophysicists and any changes or additions to existing law related to such administrative and procedural aspects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 629, Sec. 3.   (SB 1085)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7882.

A suspended certificate is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but such renewal does not entitle the holder of the certificate, while it remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the activity to which the certificate relates, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which it was suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

7883.

A revoked certificate is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the holder of the certificate, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus all accrued and unpaid renewal fees and the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 325, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7884.

Certificates of licensure as a geologist or as a geophysicist or certified specialty certificates which are not renewed within five years after expiration shall not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued thereafter. The holder of that certificate may apply for and obtain a new certificate, however, if:

(a) He or she has not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(b) He or she takes and passes the examination, if any, which would be required of him or her if he or she were then applying for the certificate for the first time.

The board may,
 by regulation, provide for the waiver or refund of all or any part of the application fee in those cases in which a certificate is issued without an examination pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 21.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7886.

(a) The department shall receive and account for all money derived under the operation of this chapter and, at the end of each month, shall report such money to the Controller and shall pay it to the Treasurer, who shall keep the money in a separate fund known as the Professional Engineer’s, Land Surveyor’s, and Geologist’s Fund.

(b) For accounting and recordkeeping purposes, the Professional Engineer’s, Land Surveyor’s, and Geologist’s Fund shall be deemed to be a single special fund and shall be available for expenditure only for the purposes as are now or may hereafter be provided by law.

(c) The fees and civil penalties received under
 this chapter shall be deposited in the Professional Engineer’s, Land Surveyor’s, and Geologist’s Fund. All moneys in the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes of this chapter.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 22) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 428, Sec. 23.   (AB 177)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7887.

The amount of the fees prescribed by this chapter shall be fixed by the board in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) The fee for filing an application for licensure as a geologist or a geophysicist or certification as a specialty geologist or a specialty geophysicist shall be fixed at not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The
 fee for filing an application for certification as a geologist-in-training shall be fixed at not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) The renewal fee for a geologist or for a geophysicist shall be fixed at not more than four hundred dollars ($400).

(c) The renewal fee for a specialty geologist or for a specialty geophysicist shall be fixed at not more than four hundred dollars ($400).

(d) Notwithstanding Section 163.5, the delinquency fee for a certificate is an amount equal to
 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date.

(e) Each applicant for licensure as a geologist shall pay an examination fee fixed at an amount equal to the actual cost to the board to administer the examination described in subdivision (d) of Section 7841, unless an applicant pays the examination fee directly to an organization pursuant to Section 7844.

(f) Each applicant for licensure as a geophysicist or certification as an engineering geologist or certification as a hydrogeologist shall pay an examination fee fixed by the board at an amount equal to the actual cost to the board for the development and maintenance of the written
 examination.

(g) The fee for a retired license shall be fixed at not more than 50 percent of the fee for filing an application for licensure as a geologist or a geophysicist in effect on the date of application for a retired license.

(h) All other document fees
 shall be established by the board by regulation and shall be set in an amount not to exceed a reasonable regulatory cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 154, Sec. 7.   (SB 1098)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Shorthand Reporters [8000. - 8051.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [8000. - 8011.]

8000.

(a) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a Court Reporters Board of California, which consists of five members, three of whom shall be public members and two of whom shall be holders of certificates issued under this chapter who have been actively engaged as shorthand reporters within this state for at least five years immediately preceding their appointment.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8001.

(a) Appointment as a member of the board shall be for a term of four years. Members of the board shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of their successors or until one year shall have elapsed since the expiration of the term for which they were appointed, whichever first occurs. No person shall serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive terms except as provided in Section 131. Vacancies occurring shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

(b) The Governor shall appoint one of the public members and the two certified members qualified as provided in Section 8000. The Senate Rules Committee and the
 Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member.

(c) Members of the board may be removed from office by their appointing authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 463, Sec. 2.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8002.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1645.)
-------------------------------------------

8003.

At each yearly meeting, a chair and vice chair shall be elected from the membership of the board. Three members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The board shall keep a complete record of all its proceedings and all certificates issued, renewed, or revoked, together with a detailed statement of receipts and disbursements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 463, Sec. 3.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8004.

The expenses of the members of the board and the expenses of the board that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter shall be paid from the fees collected under this chapter and such expenses shall not exceed the amount so collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 191.)
-------------------------------------------

8005.

(a) The Court Reporters Board of California is charged with the executive functions necessary for effectuating the purposes of this chapter. It may appoint committees as it deems necessary or proper. The board may appoint, prescribe the duties, and fix the salary of an executive officer. Except as provided by Section 159.5, the board may also employ other employees as may be necessary, subject to civil service and other law.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 587, Sec. 2.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8005.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Court Reporters Board of California in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8007.

The board shall:

(a) Determine the qualifications of persons applying for certificates under this chapter.

(b) Make rules for the examination of applicants and the issuing of certificates provided for in this chapter.

(c) Grant certificates to such applicants as may, upon examination, be qualified in professional shorthand reporting and in such other subjects as the board may deem advisable.

(d) Adopt, amend, or repeal
 rules and regulations which are reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 608.)
-------------------------------------------

8008.

The board has the following powers and duties:

(a) To adopt a seal.

(b) By affirmative vote of at least three members of the board, to suspend, revoke, or impose any other disciplinary action against a certificate for any cause specified in this chapter.

(c) To charge and collect all fees as provided for in this chapter.

(d) To require the renewal of all certificates.

(e) To issue subpoenas, to administer oaths, and to take testimony concerning any matter within the jurisdiction of the board.

(f) To investigate the actions of any licensee, upon receipt of a verified complaint in writing from any person, for alleged acts or omissions constituting grounds for disciplinary action under the chapter.

(g) To administer the Transcript Reimbursement Fund described in Section 8030.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8009.

Disciplinary proceedings under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 191.)
-------------------------------------------

8010.

Information regarding a complaint against a specific licensee may not be disclosed to the public until an accusation has been filed by the board and the licensee has been notified of the filing of the accusation against his or her license and the disciplinary proceedings to be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. This section does not apply to citations, fines, letters of reprimand, or orders of abatement, which shall be disclosed to the public upon notice to the
 licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 658, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8011.

The board shall promulgate, by regulation, a definition of a “full-time student” for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 615, Sec. 11.   Effective October 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Application of Chapter [8015. - 8019.]

8015.

This chapter is designed to establish and maintain a standard of competency for those engaged in the practice of shorthand reporting, for the protection of the public, in general, and for the protection of all litigants whose rights to personal freedom and property are affected by the competency of shorthand reporters, in particular.

This section shall become operative on June 30, 1996.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 529, Sec. 4) by Stats. 1990, Ch. 505, Sec. 4.   Section operative June 30, 1996, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8016.

(a) No person shall engage in the practice of shorthand reporting as defined in this chapter, unless that person is the holder of a certificate in full force and effect issued by the board. This section does not apply to a salaried, full-time employee of any department or agency of the state who is employed as a hearing reporter.

(b) (1) A certified shorthand reporter, whether appearing in person or through the use of remote technology, shall state on the record their full name and license number as each appears on their certificate issued by the board, at the beginning of a proceeding, deposition, or other matter for transcription as described in Section 8017.

(2) If a certified shorthand reporter is to appear for more than one proceeding or hearing on a court calendar, the requirements of paragraph (1) are satisfied if the reporter provides their full name and license number to the clerk prior to the first proceeding or hearing or meets the requirements of paragraph (1) for the first proceeding.

(c) This section shall apply to all persons who are appointed, on and after January 1, 1983, to the position of official reporter or pro tempore official reporter of any court, as defined in the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 587, Sec. 3.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8017.

The practice of shorthand reporting is defined as the making, by means of written symbols or abbreviations in shorthand or machine shorthand writing, or by voice writing, of a verbatim record of any oral court proceeding, deposition, court ordered hearing or arbitration, or proceeding before any grand jury, referee, or court commissioner and the accurate transcription thereof. Nothing in this section shall require the use of a certified shorthand reporter when not otherwise required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 4.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8017.5.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Voice writer” means a certified shorthand reporter that makes a verbatim record or a proceeding using a closed microphone voice dictation silencer, steno mask, or similar device using oral shorthand and voice notes.

 (b) “Voice writing” means a verbatim record or a proceeding using a closed microphone voice dictation silencer, steno mask, or similar device using oral shorthand and voice notes made by a certified shorthand reporter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 5.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8018.

A natural person who holds a valid certificate as a shorthand reporter, as provided in this chapter, shall be known as a “certified shorthand reporter.” Except as provided in Section 8043, no other person, entity, firm, or corporation may assume or use the title “certified shorthand reporter,” or the abbreviation “C.S.R.,” or use any words or symbols indicating or tending to indicate that they are, or it is, certified under this chapter. Use of the words “stenographer,” or “reporter,” or of the phrases “court reporter,” “deposition reporter,” “digital reporter,” or “voice writer,” in combination with words or phrases related to the practice of shorthand reporting, as defined in Section 8017, indicates or tends to indicate certification pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 587, Sec. 4.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8019.

A violation of any provision of this chapter is a misdemeanor.

Any person who directly or indirectly assists in or abets the violation of, or conspires to aid or abet in the violation of, any provision of this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1265, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application, Examination, and Certificate; Requirement and Contents [8020. - 8027.5.]

8020.

Any person over the age of 18 years, who has not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for the denial of licensure under Sections 480, 8025, and 8025.1, who has a high school education or its equivalent as determined by the board, and who has satisfactorily passed an examination under any regulations that the board may prescribe, or has met the examination requirements pursuant to Section 8020.5, shall be entitled to a certificate and shall be styled and known as a certified shorthand reporter. No person shall be admitted to the examination without first presenting satisfactory evidence to the board that the applicant has obtained one of the following:

(a) One year of experience in making verbatim records of depositions, arbitrations, hearings, or judicial or related
 proceedings by means of written symbols or abbreviations in shorthand or machine shorthand writing or voice writing and transcribing these records.

(b) A verified certificate of satisfactory completion of a prescribed course of study in a recognized court reporting school or a certificate from the school that evidences an equivalent proficiency and the ability to make a verbatim record of material dictated in accordance with regulations adopted by the board contained in Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations. For purposes of this subdivision, and until the board adopts regulations governing voice writing, but in any case no later than January 1, 2024, references contained in Section 2411 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations to “machine shorthand” shall include voice writing.

(c) A certificate from the National Court Reporters Association or the National
 Verbatim Reporters Association demonstrating proficiency in machine shorthand reporting or voice writing.

(d) A valid certified shorthand reporters certificate or license to practice shorthand reporting issued by a state other than California whose requirements and licensing examination are substantially the same as those in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 587, Sec. 5.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8020.5.

(a) (1) The California state licensing examination shall consist of the following three divisible parts:

(A) English.

(B) Professional Practice.

(C) Dictation/Transcription (Machine/Skill).

(2) (A) The passing grades for the Dictation/Transcription part of the examination is 95 percent.

(B) (i) The passing grades for English and Professional Practice, the two written knowledge parts of the
 examination, shall be determined by the Angoff criterion-referenced method.

(ii) The passing scores may vary moderately with changes in test composition.

(iii) Any examinee who obtains a grade that equals or exceeds the passing score determined by the Angoff criterion-referenced method shall be deemed to have passed the applicable portion of the examination if the other requirements of this section are met.

(b) The board shall notify each examinee electronically or in writing of their pass or fail examination results.

(c) (1) An applicant shall take and pass all three parts of the examination within three consecutive years to have passed
 the examination.

(2) The three-year period shall begin from the date of the examination or any part of the examination for which the applicant is first scheduled.

(d) (1) After a period of four months has elapsed, an applicant may repeat any part of the examination.

(2) An applicant shall not repeat any part of the examination unless or until a new version of the examination has been introduced.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), an applicant who passes a part of the examination shall receive conditional credit for passing that part and may retake the remaining parts.

(f) The period of time designated in subdivision (c) may be
 extended by the board for a period of time not to exceed one year upon the showing of extraordinary extenuating circumstances.

(g) (1) Successful completion of the Certified Verbatim Reporter (CVR), Certified Verbatim Reporter-Stenotype (CVR-S) certification administered through the National Verbatim Reporters Association, or successful completion of the Registered Professional Reporter (RPR) certification administered through the National Court Reporters Association satisfies the requirement to pass the Dictation/Transcription examination under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) Applicants who passed the Certified Verbatim Reporter (CVR), Certified Verbatim Reporter-Stenotype (CVR-S), or Registered Professional Reporter
 (RPR) certification are subject to the requirements identified under subdivision (a) for the English examination and the Professional Practice examination, all of which must be passed within three consecutive years, pursuant to subdivision (c), to have passed the California state licensing examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 312, Sec. 1.   (AB 2783)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8021.

Examinations shall be held at least semiannually, and at such times and places as the board may designate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 191.)
-------------------------------------------

8022.

(a) Each applicant for a certificate under this chapter shall file an application with the executive officer, on a form as prescribed by the board. The last date to file an application shall be a set number of days as established by the board’s regulations. The application shall be accompanied by the required fee. For purposes of determining the date upon which an application is deemed filed with the executive officer, the date of postmark as affixed by the United States Postal Service, or the date certified by a bona fide private courier service on the envelope containing the application shall control.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the board’s authority to seek from any applicant any other information pertinent to the background, education, and experience of the applicant that may be deemed necessary in order to evaluate the applicant’s qualifications and fitness for licensure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1079, Sec. 16.   Effective September 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8023.

No certificate shall be issued until the applicant has passed the examination prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

8023.5.

If an applicant for a certificate is from a country where the principal language spoken is one other than English, the board may, in addition to any other examination required by this chapter, examine the applicant on his or her knowledge of the English language.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1097, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8024.

(a) All certificates issued pursuant to this chapter shall be valid for a period of one year, except for the initial period of licensure as prescribed by the board, and shall expire at 12 midnight on the last day of the month of birth of the licensee unless renewed.

(b) (1) The board shall indicate on each certificate issued pursuant to this chapter whether the certificate holder met the certified shorthand reporter examination requirements through the use of stenography, voice writing, or both.

(2) A certified shorthand reporter
 shall only provide services pursuant to this chapter using the methodology indicated on their certificate pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Except as provided in paragraph (2), nothing in this section shall be construed to confer any distinction in privilege or practice authority based upon whether a certificate holder met the certified shorthand reporter examination requirements through the use of stenography, voice writing, or both.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the board shall indicate the methodology used by a certificate holder to meet the certified shorthand reporter examination requirements by providing a letter or notice to the certificate holder instead of
 indicating it on the certificate until July 1, 2023, or until the board has updated its systems and procedures in order to implement paragraph (1), whichever occurs first.

 (c) To renew an unexpired certificate, the certificate holder shall, on or before each of the dates on which it would otherwise expire, do all of the following:

(1) Apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board.

(2) Pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter.

(3) Notify the board whether they have been convicted of any felony or any misdemeanor if the misdemeanor is substantially related to the functions and duties of a court reporter and whether any disciplinary action by any regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state was taken against the licensee subsequent to the licensee’s last renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 8.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8024.1.

Every person to whom a certificate is issued shall, as a condition precedent to its issuance, and in addition to any other fee which may be payable, pay the initial certificate fee prescribed by this chapter. Prior to receipt of an initial certificate fee, the board may issue an interim permit of a limited duration, but only to candidates eligible for certification under Section 8020. A limited permit shall be valid for 45 days, or until the board issues a certificate to the limited permitholder. If the board issues interim permits, the initial certificate fee, and any other fee that may be payable, shall be paid prior to the issuance of the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 865, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

8024.2.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this article, a certificate that has expired may be renewed at any time within the period set forth in Section 8024.5 by doing all of the following:

(1) Applying for renewal on a form prescribed by the board.

(2) Paying the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter.

(3) Notifying the board whether the licensee has been convicted of any felony or any misdemeanor if the misdemeanor is substantially related to the functions and duties of a court reporter and whether any disciplinary action was taken against the licensee by any regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state, subsequent to the licensee’s last renewal.

(b) If the certificate is not renewed within 30 days after its expiration, the certificate holder, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee set forth in Section 163.5. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the renewal fee is paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the certificate shall continue in effect through the date provided in Section 8024 which next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

The certificate shall not be renewed if the certificate holder has failed to pay monetary sanctions identified in subdivision (g) of Section 8025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 616, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8024.3.

A suspended certificate is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but such renewal does not entitle the holder of the certificate, while it remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the activity to which the certificate relates, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which it was suspended.

The certificate shall not be renewed if the certificate holder has failed to pay monetary sanctions identified in subdivision (g) of Section 8025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 983, Sec. 9.3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8024.4.

A revoked certificate is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the holder of the certificate, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

The certificate shall not be renewed if the certificate holder has failed to pay monetary sanctions identified in subdivision (g) of Section 8025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 983, Sec. 9.4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8024.5.

A certificate that is not renewed within three years after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued thereafter. The holder of the certificate shall return the expired certificate to the board. To obtain a new certificate, the holder shall pay all of the fees and meet all of the qualifications and requirements set forth in this chapter for obtaining an original certificate, including qualifying for, taking, and passing the licensing examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 475, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8024.6.

(a) A certificate holder shall give written notice to the board at its office in Sacramento of a name change within 30 days after each change, giving both the old and the new names. A copy of the legal document affecting the name change, such as a court order or marriage certificate, shall be submitted with the notice.

(b) Each certificate holder shall notify the board in writing at its office in Sacramento of a change of address within 30 days after each change, giving both the old and the new addresses.

(c) A penalty as provided in this chapter shall be paid by each certificate holder who fails to notify the board within 30 days as specified in this section. Any certificate holder to whom this penalty applies who fails to pay that penalty shall not have their certificate renewed without payment of that penalty, and the board may take disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 983, Sec. 9.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8024.7.

The board shall establish an inactive category of licensure for persons who are not actively engaged in the practice of shorthand reporting.

(a) The holder of an inactive license issued pursuant to this section shall not engage in any activity for which a license is required.

(b) An inactive license issued pursuant to this section shall be renewed during the same time period in which an active license is renewed. The holder of an inactive license is exempt from any continuing education requirement for renewal of an active license.

(c) The renewal fee for a license in an active status shall apply also for a renewal of a license in an inactive status, unless a lesser renewal fee is specified by the board.

(d) In order for the holder of an inactive license issued pursuant to this section to restore his or her license to an active status, the holder of an inactive license shall comply with both of the following:

(1) Pay the renewal fee.

(2) If the board requires completion of continuing education for renewal of an active license, complete continuing education equivalent to that required for renewal of an active license, unless a different requirement is specified by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 660, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8024.8.

(a) The board shall maintain records showing which certificate holders have qualified through shorthand or machine shorthand writing and which certificate holders have qualified through voice writing. The board shall treat certificate holders equally regardless of the method of qualification.

(b) Public employers shall not differentiate among certificate holders based upon method of qualification for purposes of compensation, benefits, classification, job description, duties, or bargaining units.

(c) A reference in any statute, regulation, or rule of court to the shorthand notes or stenographic notes of a certified shorthand reporter shall be interpreted to include audio dictation
 files.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 9.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8024.9.

(a) For purposes of this section, “valid email address” means an email address at which the applicant or certificate holder is currently receiving email regarding their licensed activities at the time the application or renewal is submitted to the board. A personal email address of an applicant or certificate holder shall not be considered a valid email address and is not required to be provided by the applicant or certificate holder.

(b) An applicant or renewing certificate holder who has a valid email address shall provide that email address to the board at the time of application or renewal.

(c) An applicant or certificate holder shall notify the board within 30 days of any
 change to their valid email address on file with the board.

(d) (1) The board shall inform an applicant or certificate holder, at the time of their application for certification or renewal of their certification, that any valid email address submitted to the board is a public record that is subject to disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(2) The board may, at its discretion, forward communications to a certificate holder’s valid email address that it receives from clients and consumers seeking to obtain a transcript or other timely information from a certificate holder.

(e) The board shall take reasonable actions to encourage applicants and certificate holders to maintain a valid email
 address, including by adding a statement to that effect on applications for certification or renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 587, Sec. 7.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8025.

A certificate issued under this chapter may be suspended, revoked, denied, or other disciplinary action may be imposed for one or more of the following causes:

(a) Conviction of any felony or any misdemeanor if the misdemeanor is substantially related to the functions and duties of a court reporter. The record of conviction, or a certified copy thereof, is conclusive evidence of the conviction.

(b) Failure to notify the board of a conviction described in subdivision (a), in accordance with Section 8024 or 8024.2.

(c) Fraud or misrepresentation resorted to in obtaining a certificate hereunder.

(d) Fraud, dishonesty, corruption, willful violation of duty, gross negligence or incompetence in practice, or unprofessional conduct in or directly related to the practice of shorthand reporting.

“Unprofessional conduct” includes, but is not limited to, acts contrary to professional standards concerning confidentiality; impartiality; filing and retention of notes; notifications, availability, delivery, execution and certification of transcripts; and any provision of law substantially related to the duties of a certified shorthand reporter.
